District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1511

Staff of Personal Tax Appraisers; appointment and duties of personnel.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 24, 34 DCR 850

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 47-1510, 47-1511.